Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 4. Viaduct and Subway Bonds

Cross references. —

As to power of Wyoming transportation commission for construction of grade crossings, see §

37-10-105

.

§ 18-4-401.
Power of county commissioners.

Each board of county commissioners may establish, construct, purchase, extend, maintain and regulate highway viaducts or subways on any highway including city or town streets within the county.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 167, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 29-801; C.S. 1945, § 28-501; W.S. 1957, § 18-254; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Legislative intent as to selection of procedure where not specified. —

In the absence of a reference to a particular bonding procedure, the legislature intended in enacting ch. 150, Laws 1951 (§§

18-9-101

to

18-9-103

), relative to issuance of bonds for fairgrounds, airports, parks, etc., that the board of county commissioners should have the right and option to select and follow either of the statutory requirements then in effect (§§

18-4-301

to

18-4-303

and

18-4-306

to

18-4-310

, relative to bonds generally, or §§

18-4-401

to

18-4-409

, relative to viaducts and subway bonds) and otherwise applicable to the proposed bond issue. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1959).

No material variance between statutes. —

An examination of the provisions of §§

18-4-301

to

18-4-303

,

18-4-306

to

18-4-310

and

18-4-401

to

18-4-409

discloses no material variance between them. In fact, many requirements in both statutes are couched in identical language. Both provide that the board of county commissioners shall cause to be levied annually upon all taxable property in the county, in addition to other authorized taxes, a tax in a sum sufficient to pay the interest on bonds as the same becomes due and to redeem the bonds upon maturity, said tax to be levied and collected in the same manner as other taxes in said county. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1959).

Delegation of taxing authority sufficient under either statute to meet constitutional requirements. —

The delegation of taxing authority is sufficient under either §§

18-4-301

to

18-4-303

and

18-4-306

to

18-4-310

, relative to bonds generally, or §§

18-4-401

to

18-4-409

, relative to viaduct and subway bonds, to meet the requirements set forth in art. 15, § 13, Wyo. Const.Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1959).

§ 18-4-402.
Call for bond election; amount authorized; purpose.

Each board of county commissioners may submit to the electors of the county the question whether the board of county commissioners shall be authorized to issue bonds of the county in an amount which together with existing indebtedness shall not exceed the county’s constitutional debt limitation, for the purposes specified in W.S.

18-4-401

.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 167, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 29-802; C.S. 1945, § 28-502; W.S. 1957, § 18-255; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to bond elections generally, see §§

22-21-101

to

22-21-112

.

§ 18-4-403.
Conduct of election.

The proposition to issue the bonds shall be submitted to the qualified electors of the county at an election called, conducted, canvassed and returned in the manner provided for bond elections by the Political Subdivision Bond Election Law, W.S.

22-21-101

through

22-21-112

. The proposition submitted shall specify the amount of bonds to be issued, the rate of interest and the purpose for which it is proposed. At any election the official ballot shall contain the words “For Viaduct or Subway Bonds” and “Against Viaduct or Subway Bonds.”

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 167, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 29-803; C.S. 1945, § 28-503; W.S. 1957, § 18-256; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1996, ch. 97, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to bond elections generally, see §§

22-21-101

to

22-21-112

.

§ 18-4-404.
Form, terms, conditions and execution of bonds; payment and interest; sale price.

The viaduct or subway bonds:

Shall be payable thirty (30) years from the date of issue;

Shall be redeemable at the option of the county after ten (10) years;

Shall bear interest payable on January 15 and July 15 each year;

Shall be issued in any combination of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), five hundred dollars ($500.00) or one hundred dollars ($100.00) denominations;

Shall be consecutively numbered from the number one (1);

Shall be signed by the chairman of the board of county commissioners and attested by the county clerk who shall affix the county seal thereto;

May have attached when negotiated, semiannual interest coupons signed by the county treasurer.

At the request of the purchaser or holder the county treasurer shall issue to him registered bonds or shall exchange registered bonds for coupon bonds. The principal and interest shall be payable at the office of the county treasurer of the county, at the office of the state treasurer or at some bank in the City of New York as designated by the board of county commissioners. The bonds shall not be sold for less than their full or par value and the accrued interest thereon at the time of delivery.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 167, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 29-804; C.S. 1945, § 28-504; Laws 1971, ch. 254, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 18-257; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to interest rates generally, see § 40-14-106(e).

§ 18-4-405.
Notice of intention to issue and sell.

The board of county commissioners shall give notice by posting on the county’s official website in the manner provided in W.S. 18-3-516(f) and by publication in the county’s designated official newspaper.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 167, § 5; R.S. 1931, § 29-805; C.S. 1945, § 28-505; W.S. 1957, § 18-258; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2014 ch. 85, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

rewrote the section which formally read: “The board of county commissioners shall give notice by publication in some newspaper published and of general circulation in the county if there be one; otherwise by three (3) notices posted in the county one (1) of which is posted at the courthouse door, of its intention to issue and negotiate the bonds and to invite bidders therefor. The notice shall also be published in some newspaper published and of general circulation in the cities of Cheyenne, Wyoming; Denver, Colorado; Chicago, Illinois and New York City, New York.”

§ 18-4-406.
Registration and endorsement.

The county treasurer shall maintain records in which is registered all bonds showing the number of the bond, the amount, date of issue, to whom issued, date of redemption, rate of and payment of interest and the time and place of payment. The county clerk shall endorse and officially sign a certificate upon every bond that it is within the lawful debt limit of the county and is issued according to law.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 167, § 6; R.S. 1931, § 29-806; C.S. 1945, § 28-506; W.S. 1957, § 18-259; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1980, ch. 49, § 2.

§ 18-4-407.
Tax levy for purpose of redemption; restriction upon use of monies collected.

The board of county commissioners shall annually levy upon all taxable property in the county in addition to other authorized taxes a tax sufficient to pay the principal and interest on the bonds as they become due which shall be levied and collected in the same manner as other taxes in the county. The taxes collected shall be known as the viaduct or subway tax and shall only be used for the payment of interest and principal of the bonds.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 167, § 7; R.S. 1931, § 29-807; C.S. 1945, § 28-507; W.S. 1957, § 18-260; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-4-408.
Payment from general fund when tax not levied; reimbursement.

Should the tax for the payment of interest on any bonds not be levied or collected in time to meet the payment the interest shall be paid out of any monies in the general fund of the county and the money so used shall be repaid to the general fund from the first monies collected from viaduct or subway taxes.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 167, § 8; R.S. 1931, § 29-808; C.S. 1945, § 28-508; W.S. 1957, § 18-261; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-4-409.
Redemption of bonds.

Any county issuing bonds shall annually after the tenth year redeem at least one-twentieth (1/20) of the bonds. The bonds redeemed each year shall be determined by lot.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 167, § 9; R.S. 1931, § 29-809; C.S. 1945, § 28-509; W.S. 1957, § 18-262; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.